Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-2104
Rural infrastructure development;
jurisdictional utility; powers.

A jurisdictional utility may undertake rural infrastructure
development necessary to supply unserved or underserved areas in or adjacent
to areas presently served by the jurisdictional utility and not served by
another jurisdictional utility.

Laws 2012, LB1115, § 4.